zh-CN: 喷雾模式: 细流; 扇形; 细雾; 直流; 其他
pt-BR: Padrão de spray: Garoa; Ventilador; Névoa fina; Fluxo; Outro
sl-SI: Vzorec razprševanja: Rosenje; Pahljača; Fina meglica; Tok; Druga
pt-PT: Padrão de pulverização: Chuva miúda; Leque; Névoa fina; Jato; Outro
en: Spray pattern: Drizzle; Fan; Fine mist; Stream; Other
hr-HR: Obrazac prskanja: Lagani mlaz; Lepezasti; Fina maglica; Puni mlaz; Ostalo
pl: Wzór natrysku: Delikatna mgiełka; Strumień wachlarzowy; Drobna mgiełka; Strumień; Inne
fi: Suihkukuvio: Tihkusade; Viuhka; Hieno sumu; Yhtenäinen suihku; Muu
cs: Tvar rozstřiku: Mrholení; Vějířovitý rozstřik; Jemná mlha; Proud; Jiné
hu: Szóráskép: Szitálás; Legyező; Finom köd; Folyamatos áramlás; Egyéb
nl: Spuitpatroon: Sproei; Ventilator; Fijne nevel; Straal; Overig
ja: 噴射パターン: 霧雨; ファンノズル; 微細ミスト; ストリーム; その他
th: รูปแบบการฉีดพ่น: พ่นเบาและละเอียด; ทรงพัด; ละอองฝอย; ต่อเนื่องเป็นลำ; อื่นๆ
el: Μοτίβο ψεκασμού: Ψιλοβρέχει; Τύπου βεντάλιας; Λεπτή ομίχλη; Ρεύμα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Model de pulverizare: Stropire fină; Evantai; Ceață fină; Jet; Altele
ru: Форма распыления: Поливка; Веерное; Мелкодисперсный туман; Поток; Другое
it: Schema di spruzzo: Pioviggine; Ventola; Nebbia sottile; Flusso; Altro
sv: Spraymönster: Dugga; Fläkt; Fin dimma; Ström; Annat
tr: Püskürtme şekli: İnce akış; Yelpaze; İnce püskürtme; Düz akış; Diğer
nb: Sprøytemønster: Yr; Vifte; Fin tåke; Strøm; Annet
sk-SK: Vzor striekania: Mrholenie; Ventilátor; Jemná hmla; Prúd; Iné
fr: Forme du jet: Jet en filet; Cordage; Fine brume; Flux; Autre
ko: 분사 패턴: 흩뿌리기; 팬; 미세 안개 분사; 직사; 기타
vi: Kiểu phun: Phun hạt nhỏ; Đầu xòe; Phun sương mịn; Phun tia nước; Khác
da: Sprøjtemønster: Støvregn; Vifte; Fin tåge; Strøm; Andet
zh-TW: 噴灑樣式: 噴霧雨; 扇型; 細霧; 水流; 其他
lt-LT: Purškimo srovė: Dulksna; Vėduoklė; Smulkus rūkas; Srautas; Kita
de: Sprühbild: Nieselregen; Fächer; Feiner Nebel; Schwall; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Форма на струята: Ситен дъжд; Вентилатор; Фина мъгла; Струя; Друго
es: Patrón de pulverización: Llovizna; Ventilador; Niebla fina; Arroyo; Otros